Oklahoma, session 2025, SB752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1500.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1500.1. A. Except as otherwise provided by Section
1500 et seq. of this title, the county purchasing agent shall have
the authority to develop, implement, and promote policies and
procedures that allow the procurement of materials and equipment
through contracts that are flexible, value based and are in the best
interests of the state and its political subdivisions.
B. Except as otherwise provided, the county purchasing agent
shall have the authority to use electronic commerce for the
solicitation, notification, and other purchasing processes. For
purposes of this subsection, “electronic commerce” means the use of
electronic methods to enable solicitations, open bids, supplier
response, bid submission, notice of contract award, county
acquisition processes, or any other function to make an acquisition.

C. The boards of county commissioners shall have the authority
to conduct a procurement transaction by electronic means subject to
the provisions of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
D. The board of county commissioners shall have the authority
to establish an online bidding process with a vendor authorized by
state contract as provided by the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services.
1. The purchasing agent shall comply with all bid notice
requirements as prescribed in paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section
1505 of this title or the Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974.
2. Solicitations shall designate an opening and closing date
and time for bids. Sealed bids received pursuant to this subsection
shall be first opened in an open meeting of the board of county
commissioners concurrently with other sealed bids received as
provided in Section 1505 of this title or the Public Competitive
Bidding Act of 1974.
3. The board of county commissioners shall be authorized to
require online bidders to register before the opening date and time
and, as part of that registration, require bidders to agree to any
terms, conditions, or other requirements of the solicitation or
applicable acts.
4. The board of county commissioners shall be authorized to
require potential online bidders to prequalify as bidders.
Solicitations and published bid notices shall indicate the
prequalification requirements for online bids. Bids submitted by
online bidders not meeting a prequalification requirement shall be
disqualified from consideration.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 752 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 752 Page 3